Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202016-692
Water commissioner; city council member and mayor ineligible.

No member of the city council or the mayor of a city of the first class shall be eligible to the office of water commissioner during the term for which he or she shall be elected.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 64, p. 278;

R.S.1913, § 4964;

C.S.1922, § 4133;

C.S.1929, § 16-662;

R.S.1943, § 16-692;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 151;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 71.